Utah statutes.
41-1a-111.   Cancellation, suspension, or revocation of registration -- Return of registration items.

If the division cancels, suspends, or revokes a registration, certificate of title, license plate, or permit under this chapter, the owner or person in possession of it shall immediately return the canceled, suspended, or revoked item to the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 1, 1992 General Session

